Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-238
Spread of disease; regulation; board of health; creation; powers; duties.

A city of the first class may make regulations to prevent the introduction and spread of contagious, infectious, or malignant diseases into the city. In cities with a commission plan of government as provided in the Municipal Commission Plan of Government Act and cities with a city manager plan of government as provided in the City Manager Plan of Government Act, a board of health shall be created consisting of five members: The mayor, who shall be chairperson, a physician, who shall be medical adviser, the chief of police, who shall be secretary and quarantine officer, and two other members. In all other cities, a board of health shall be created consisting of five members: The mayor, who shall be chairperson, a physician, who shall be medical adviser, the chief of police, who shall be secretary and quarantine officer, the president of the city council, and one other member. A majority of such board shall constitute a quorum and shall enact rules and regulations, having the force and effect of law, to safeguard the health of the people of such city and prevent nuisances and unsanitary conditions, enforce the same, and provide fines and punishments for the violation of such rules and regulations.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XLIV, p. 257;

R.S.1913, § 4854;

Laws 1919, c. 37, § 1, p. 118;

C.S.1922, § 4022;

C.S.1929, § 16-239;

R.S.1943, § 16-238;

Laws 1977, LB 190, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 119, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1019, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 38;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 2.

City Manager Plan of Government Act, see section 19-601.

Municipal Commission Plan of Government Act, see section 19-401.